New Jersey, session 222, A4940.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section: Department means the Department of Environmental Protection. Mobile sport fishing permit means a permit of any type, class, or duration which is made available by the department to allow for the operation of a motor vehicle on a beach for the purpose of fishing, including annual, 3-day, weekday, and daily mobile sport fishing permits. b.  The department shall: (1)   begin to sell mobile sport fishing permits commencing on December 15 of each calendar year; (2)   not limit the number of mobile sport fishing permits issued in a calendar year; and (3)   process applications in the order in which they are received. c.  Commencing on December 15, 2027, and continuing each calendar year thereafter, the department shall not approve an application for a mobile sport fishing permit unless the applicant has demonstrated proof to the department of a valid registration with the New Jersey Saltwater Recreational Registry Program in the form of a valid New Jersey Conservation Identification Number. d.  Commencing on December 15, 2027, and continuing each calendar year thereafter, the department shall allow a person who holds a valid weekday mobile sport fishing permit to convert the permit into an annual mobile sport fishing permit upon paying the difference in cost. e.  The department shall dedicate no less than 10 percent of the proceeds of the sale of mobile sport fishing permits each calendar year to the maintenance of Island Beach State Park. f.  The department shall, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules and regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 2. This act shall take effect six months after the date of enactment, except that the Department of Environmental Protection may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as may be necessary for the implementation of this act